apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.ca.dix
    <pardef n="cob/rir__vblex">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riríem</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riria</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riríeu</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riries</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ririen</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riria</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rirem</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riré</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rireu</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riràs</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riran</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rirà</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rint</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rint</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>rírem</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>rí</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ríreu</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>rires</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>riren</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>rí</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rim</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rim</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riu</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riu</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reix</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>rix</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reix</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>rix</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reixin</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>resquen</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>risquen</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reixin</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>resquen</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>risquen</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reixi</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>resca</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>risca</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reixi</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>resca</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>risca</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rir</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rir</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ríem</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ria</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ríeu</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ries</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rien</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ria</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ríssim</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>rírem</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rís</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>rira</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>

<e lm="cobrir"><i>cob</i><par n="cob/rir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="descobrir">   <i>descob</i>   <par n="cob/rir__vblex"/>    </e>
<e lm="encobrir"><i>encob</i><par n="cob/rir__vblex"/></e>
